Maryland, session 2026, HB0381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0381*

HOUSE BILL 381
8–204.3.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2029, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL INSTALL A TRAFFIC CONTROL
DEVICE PROHIBITING A VEHICLE FROM MAKING A RIGHT TURN WHILE FACING A
STEADY RED SIGNAL AT EACH INTERSECTION ON A STATE HIGHWAY IN AN URBAN
CORE OR URBAN CENTER, AS DESCRIBED IN THE ADMINISTRATION’S CONTEXT
DRIVEN GUIDE, AT WHICH A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL IS IN USE.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY CHOOSE NOT TO INSTALL A TRAFFIC
CONTROL DEVICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AT A SPECIFIC
INTERSECTION IF THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT THE INSTALLATION
WOULD SIGNIFICANTLY IMPAIR PUBLIC SAFETY.
11–167.
“Traffic control device” means any sign, signal, marking, or device that:
(1) Is not inconsistent with the Maryland Vehicle Law; and
(2) Is placed by authority of an authorized public body or official to
regulate, warn, or guide traffic.
11–168.
“Traffic control signal” means any traffic control device, whether manually,
electrically, or mechanically operated, by which traffic alternately is directed to stop and
permitted to proceed.
21–202.
(i) Unless a [sign] TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICE prohibiting a turn is in place,
vehicular traffic facing a steady red signal, after stopping as required by subsection (h) of
this section, cautiously may enter the intersection and make:
(1) A right turn; or
(2) A left turn from a one–way street onto a one–way street.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.